Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1605HV (2) 91 jm/md H.F. 1037 Section 1. Section 15A.1, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. For purposes of this chapter , âeconomic developmentâ 3 means private or joint public and private investment involving 4 the creation of new jobs and income or the retention of 5 existing jobs and income that would otherwise be lost or the 6 provision of workforce housing . 7 Sec. 2. Section 15A.1, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 8 by adding the following new paragraph: 9 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. Development policies that advance the 10 development of workforce housing. 11 Sec. 3. Section 403.17, subsection 14, Code 2025, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 14. âLow or and moderate income familiesâ means those 14 families, including single person households, earning no 15 more than eighty percent of the higher of the median family 16 income of the county or the statewide nonmetropolitan area as 17 determined by the latest United States department of housing 18 and urban development, section 8 income guidelines. 19 Sec. 4. Section 403.17, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 20 following new subsection: 21 NEW SUBSECTION . 14A. âLow and moderate income family 22 housingâ means housing for low and moderate income families and 23 includes housing that meets the requirements of section 15.353. 24 Sec. 5. Section 403.22, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 25 by adding the following new paragraph: 26 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. (1) For municipalities of any population 27 size, and notwithstanding any minimum low and moderate income 28 family housing requirement, if the public improvement project 29 is approved on or after July 1, 2025, and is related to housing 30 and residential development in an economic development area 31 containing property that has been located entirely within the 32 corporate limits of a city for twenty years or more, the amount 33 to be provided for low and moderate income family housing for 34 such projects shall not be required to be greater than an 35 -1- LSB 1605HV (2) 91 jm/md 1/ 3 H.F. 1037 amount equal to twenty percent of the original project cost. 1 (2) In addition, notwithstanding subsection 5, the division 2 of the revenue under section 403.19 for each project under this 3 paragraph shall be limited to tax collections for twenty fiscal 4 years beginning with the second fiscal year after the year in 5 which the municipality first certifies to the county auditor 6 the amount of any loans, advances, indebtedness, or bonds 7 which qualify for payment from the division of the revenue in 8 connection with the project. 9